Utah statutes.
76-10-303.   Powder houses.

Every person who builds, constructs, or uses within 300 feet of any residence or traveled county road any powder house, magazine, or building in which powder, dynamite, or other explosive is kept in quantities exceeding 500 pounds is guilty of a class B misdemeanor; provided that this section shall not apply to any magazine maintained at any mine or stone quarry.



Enacted by Chapter 196, 1973 General Session

